District of Columbia statutes.
50-2635

Contractor daytime parking permit.

(a)

The District Department of Transportation (“DDOT”) shall establish a contractor daytime parking permit program (“Program”) pursuant to the requirements of this section.

(b)

Under the Program, a commercial vehicle, as defined by section 9901.1 of Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (18 DCMR § 9901.1), shall be able to obtain a contractor daytime parking permit (“CDP permit”) allowing the vehicle to be parked at a legal, on-street parking space designated for residential permit parking pursuant to sections 2411, 2412, and 2413 of Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (18 DCMR § 2411, 2412, 2413) from 7:00 a.m. until 5:00 p.m. for the purposes of construction, maintenance, or repairs conducted at a single-family residence or a residence with fewer than 4 housing units.

(c)

Only a contractor with an appropriate business or professional license, whichever is required for the contractor to do business in the District, may purchase a CDP permit.

(d)

DDOT shall sell CDP permits to licensed contractors through:

(1)

Electronic or phone-based systems;

(2)

Booklets of tickets registered to a contractor, as opposed to a specific vehicle; and

(3)

Other means selected by DDOT.

(e)

A CDP permit shall be valid for one day only and shall expire at 5 p.m. on the date for which the permit is issued.

(f)

The fee for a CDP permit shall be $10 per day, plus applicable service fees; provided, that DDOT may adjust this fee by rule.

(g)

Fees collected from the issuance of CDP permits shall be used to administer the program and shall be paid into the DDOT Enterprise Fund for Transportation Initiatives, established under § 50-921.13.

(h)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this section. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within the 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed disapproved.

(i)

One year from the date that CDP permits are first available for purchase, the Mayor shall transmit a report to the Council evaluating the Program’s performance, including an evaluation of possible abuse of the Program.

Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-254, § 2, 60 DCR 984